Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7912.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
(1) There is a need for obligated parties to reduce greenhouse gas emissions attributable to
the Rhode Island thermal sector by retiring required amounts of clean heat credits to meet the
emissions reductions required in § 42-6.2-3 ("act on climate").
(2) The clean heat standard shall be designed and implemented to enhance social equity by
minimizing adverse impacts to low-income and moderate-income customers and those households
with the highest energy burdens. The design shall ensure all customers have an equitable
opportunity to participate in, and benefit from, clean heat measures regardless of heating fuel used,
income level, geographic location, or homeownership status.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 23.8
RHODE ISLAND CLEAN HEAT STANDARD ACT
23-23.8-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rhode Island Clean Heat Standard
Act."
23-23.8-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:

(1) "Clean heat credit" means a tradeable, non-tangible commodity that represents the
amount of greenhouse gas reduction caused by a clean heat measure.
(2) "Clean heat measure" means fuel and technologies delivered and installed to end-use
customers in Rhode Island that reduce greenhouse gas emissions. Clean heat measures shall not
include switching from one fossil fuel use to another fossil fuel use, or the use of renewable natural
gas or hydrogen. The council shall adopt a list of acceptable actions that qualify as clean heat
measures, which shall include weatherization, air-source heat pumps, air-source heat pump water
heaters, ground-source heat pumps, electric stoves, and electric dryers.
(3) "Council" or "the council" means the Rhode Island executive climate change
coordinating council.
(4) "Default delivery agent" means the entity designated by the council to provide services
that generate tradeable clean heat credits.
(5) “Department of environmental management” or “DEM” means the state government
agency charged with supervising and controlling the protection, development, planning, and
utilization of the natural resources of the state and of which the director is the chair of the executive
climate change coordinating council.
(6) "Energy burden" means the annual spending on thermal energy as a percentage of
household income.
(7) "Entity" means any individual, trustee, agency, partnership, association, corporation,
company, municipality, political subdivision, or any other form of organization.
(8) "Heating fuel" means fossil-based heating fuel, including oil, propane, natural gas, coal,
and kerosene.
(9) "Obligated party" means:
(i) A natural gas utility, whether investor-owned or a municipal utility, serving customers
in Rhode Island; or
(ii) For other heating fuels, the entity that makes the first sale of heating fuel into or in the
state for consumption within the state. Electricity suppliers shall not be obligated parties.
(10) “Office of energy resources” or “OER” means the state agency charged with leading
Rhode Island towards a clean, affordable, reliable, and equitable energy future.
(11) “Public utilities commission” or “PUC” means the agency that serves as a quasi-
judicial tribunal with jurisdiction, powers, and duties to implement and enforce the standards of
conduct under § 39-1-27.6 and to hold investigations and hearings involving the rates, tariffs, tolls,
and charges, and the sufficiency and reasonableness of facilities and accommodations of railroad,
ferry boats, gas, electric distribution, water, telephone, telegraph, and pipeline public utilities, the
LC003187 - Page 2 of 8

location of railroad depots and stations, and the control of grade crossings, the revocation,
suspension or alteration of certificates issued pursuant to § 39-19-4, appeals under § 39-1-30,
petitions under § 39-1-31, and proceedings under § 39-1-32.
(12) "Thermal sector" means the residential, non-residential, commercial, and industrial
fuel use sectors.
(13) "Weatherized" and/or "weatherization" means the process of protecting a building and
its interior from the elements, particularly from sunlight, precipitation, and wind, and of modifying
a building to reduce energy consumption and optimize energy efficiency.
23-23.8-3. Clean heat standard implementation.
(a) Beginning no later than July 1, 2027, the department of environmental management
(“DEM”) shall begin promulgating rules and regulations to establish or adopt a system of tradeable
clean heat credits earned from the delivery of clean heat measures that reduce greenhouse gas
emissions. The DEM shall be the lead agency for regulations, rulemaking, enforcement, and
emissions tracking, but work in coordination with the office of energy resources (“OER”) and the
public utilities commission (“PUC”). The OER shall provide technical assistance, modeling
support, and guidance on eligible clean heat strategies and the PUC shall oversee utility cost
recovery, ratepayer protections, and plan approvals.
(b) The DEM shall make every effort to coordinate with energy efficiency programs to
prioritize energy efficiency and weatherization first before implementing other clean heat
measures. Clean heat measures shall be consistent with least cost procurement in § 39-1-27.7.
(c) An obligated party may obtain the required amount of clean heat credits through
delivery of eligible clean heat measures, through contracts for delivery of eligible clean heat
measures, through the market purchase of clean heat credits, or through delivery of eligible clean
heat measures by a designated statewide default delivery agent.
(d) The DEM, in coordination with the OER and PUC, shall establish a system of
recognition for clean heat credits pursuant to this section.
23-23.8-4. Compliance with the clean heat standard.
(a) Required amounts:
(1) The department of environmental management (“DEM”) shall establish the number of
clean heat credits that each obligated party is required to retire each calendar year. The size of the
annual requirement shall be set at a pace sufficient for the thermal sector to achieve lifecycle carbon
dioxide equivalent (CO e) emission reductions consistent with chapter 6.2 of title 42 for 2030,

2040, and 2050.
(2) Annual requirements shall be expressed as a percent of each obligated party's
LC003187 - Page 3 of 8

contribution to the thermal sector's lifecycle CO e emissions in the previous year with the annual

percentages being the same for all parties.
(3) The DEM may adjust the annual requirements for good cause after notice and
opportunity for public process. Good cause may include a shortage of clean heat credits or undue
adverse financial impacts on particular customers or demographic segments. Any downward
adjustment shall be allowed for only a short, temporary period.
(b) Annual registration:
(1) The DEM shall require registration information to include legal name, doing business
as name if applicable, municipality, state, type of heating fuel sold, and the volume of sales of
heating fuels into or in the state for final sale or consumption in the state in the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year in which the entity is registering with the council.
(2) The DEM shall maintain, and update annually, a list of registered entities on its website
that contains the required registration information, except that the public list shall not include
heating fuel volumes reported.
(3) For any entity not registered, the first registration form shall be due thirty (30) days
after the first sale of heating fuel to a location in Rhode Island.
(4) Clean heat requirements shall transfer to entities that acquire an obligated party.
(c) Equitable distribution of clean heat measures: A substantial portion of clean heat credits
retired by each obligated party shall be sourced from clean heat measures delivered to low-income
and moderate-income customers. The portion of each obligated party's required amount needed to
satisfy the annual clean heat standard requirement shall be at least twenty percent (20%) from low-
income customers and twenty percent (20%) from moderate-income customers, as those terms are
provided for in § 39-2-1.
(d) Compliance of obligated parties with the clean heat standard shall begin by July 1,
2028.
23-23.8-5. Authority.
(a) The department of environmental management (“DEM”) shall designate the default
delivery agent. The default delivery agent shall be a single statewide entity capable of providing a
variety of clean heat measures and contracted for a multiyear period through a competitive
procurement process. The entity selected as the default delivery agent may also be a market
participant but shall not be an obligated party.
(b) The DEM shall adopt annually the cost per clean heat credit to be paid to the default
delivery agent by an obligated party that chooses this option. In adjusting the default delivery agent
credit cost, the council shall consider the default delivery agent's anticipated costs to deliver clean
LC003187 - Page 4 of 8

heat measures and costs borne by customers, among other factors determined by the council.
Changes to the cost of credits shall take effect not less than one hundred eighty (180) days after
adoption.
(c) All funds received from noncompliance payments pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section shall be used by the default delivery agent to provide clean heat measures to low-income
customers.
(d) The DEM may order an obligated party that fails to retire the number of clean heat
credits required in a given year, including the required amounts from low-income and moderate-
income customers, to make a noncompliance payment to the default delivery agent. The per-credit
amount of the noncompliance payment shall be three (3) times the amount established by the
council under this section for timely per-credit payments to the default delivery agent.
(e) The DEM is granted any additional authority to implement this section, and any rules
or orders adopted to implement the provisions of this section, as may be necessary beyond its
existing authorities including, but not limited to, issuing procedures, promulgating regulations,
consulting with stakeholders, conducting public engagement, ordering penalties and injunctive
relief, and contracting as appropriate to support administration of responsibilities under this
chapter.
23-23.8-6. Tradeable clean heat credit.
(a) The department of environmental management (“DEM”) shall establish or adopt a
system of tradeable clean heat credits that may be earned by reducing greenhouse gas emissions
through the delivery of clean heat measures. While credit denominations may be in simple terms
for public understanding and ease of use, the underlying value shall be based on units of carbon
dioxide equivalent (CO e). The system shall provide a process for the recognition, approval, and

monitoring of the clean heat credits. The council shall perform the verification of clean heat credit
claims.
(b) Clean heat credits shall be based on the lifecycle CO e emission reductions that result

from the delivery of eligible clean heat measures to end-use customer locations in Rhode Island.
For clean heat measures that are installed, the value of the clean heat credits in each year shall be
the lifecycle CO e emissions of the heating fuel avoided by the installation of the measure, minus

the lifecycle CO e emissions of the energy that is used instead.

(c) To promote certainty for obligated parties and clean heat providers, the DEM shall, by
rule or order, establish a schedule of lifecycle emission rates for heating fuels and eligible clean
heat measures. The schedule shall be based on transparent and accurate emissions accounting
adapting the Argonne National Laboratory GREET Model, Intergovernmental Panel on Climate
LC003187 - Page 5 of 8

Change (IPCC) modeling, or an alternative of comparable analytical rigor to achieve the thermal
sector greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to meet the sector's share of greenhouse gas
reduction requirements to accurately account for emissions from biogenic and geologic sources,
and to deter substantial unintended harmful consequences. The schedule may be amended based
upon changes in technology or evidence on emissions, but clean heat credits previously awarded
shall not be adjusted retroactively.
(d) Clean heat credits shall be "time stamped" for the year in which the clean heat measure
is delivered as well as each subsequent year during which the measure produces emission
reductions. Only clean heat credits with the current year time stamp, and credits banked from
previous years, shall be eligible to satisfy the current year obligation.
(e) Clean heat credits can be earned only in proportion to the deemed or measured thermal
sector greenhouse gas emission reductions achieved by a clean heat measure delivered in Rhode
Island. Other emissions offsets, wherever located, shall not be eligible measures.
(f) All eligible clean heat measures that are delivered in Rhode Island shall be eligible for
clean heat credits and may be retired and count towards an obligated party's emission reduction
obligations, regardless of who creates or delivers them and regardless of whether their creation or
delivery was required by other state policies and programs. The council shall determine whether
the total value of a clean heat credit for an installed measure shall be claimed in the year it is
installed or whether the annual value of that credit shall be applied each year of the measure's life.
The DEM shall determine whether to require a certain portion of clean heat credits to be acquired
each year from weatherization projects to further the state's building efficiency goals. The council
shall recommend legislative changes, if needed, to accomplish this.
(g) The DEM shall create a registration system to lower administrative barriers to
individuals and businesses seeking to register qualified actions eligible to earn clean heat credits
and to facilitate the transfer of credits to obligated parties. The DEM may hire a third-party
consultant to evaluate, develop, implement, maintain, and support a database or other means for
tracking clean heat credits and compliance with the annual requirements of obligated parties. The
system shall require entities to submit the following information to receive the credit: the location
of the clean heat measure, whether the customer or tenant has a low- or moderate-income, the type
of property where the clean heat measure was installed or sold, the type of clean heat measure, and
any other information as required by the council.
(h) If any provision of this section or its application are held invalid or in violation of the
Constitution or laws of the United States or Rhode Island, the invalidity or the violation shall not
affect other provisions of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
LC003187 - Page 6 of 8

application, and to this end, the provisions of this section are severable.
(i) Within ninety (90) days following the enactment of this chapter, the council shall
commence any necessary proceedings to implement this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003187
========
LC003187 - Page 7 of 8